Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.305

Record check information—Access—Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement RCW 28A.400.303. The rules shall include, but not be limited to the following:

(1) Written procedures providing a school district, approved private school, Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, state school for the blind, federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded school employee, charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW, or applicant for certification or employment access to and review of information obtained based on the record check required under RCW 28A.400.303; and

(2) Written procedures limiting access to the superintendent of public instruction record check database to only those individuals processing record check information at the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the appropriate school district or districts, approved private schools, the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, the state school for the blind, the appropriate educational service district or districts, the appropriate federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools, the appropriate charter schools, and the appropriate state-tribal education compact schools.

[ 2019 c 266 s 21; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 33 s 2; 2010 c 100 s 1; 2009 c 381 s 30; 2007 c 35 s 2; 2001 c 296 s 4; 1996 c 126 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 381: See note following RCW 72.40.015.

Intent—2001 c 296: See note following RCW 9.96A.060.

Effective date—1996 c 126: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 21, 1996]." [ 1996 c 126 s 7.]